Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 208

Registered Agent

48-208-101. Registered office and registered agent.

Registered Office and Agent. Each foreign and domestic LLC must continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office that may be the same as any of its places of business; and

A registered agent, who may be: an individual who resides in this state, a domestic corporation, a not-for-profit domestic corporation, an LLC, or a foreign corporation, not-for-profit foreign corporation, or foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this state. The registered agent must maintain a business office that is identical with the registered office.

New Registered Agent Required. If a registered agent resigns or is unable to perform such agent's duties, the foreign or domestic designating LLC shall promptly designate another registered agent to the end that it shall at all times have a registered agent in this state.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-208-102. Change of registered office or registered agent.

Change in Registered Office and/or Agent by LLC. A foreign or domestic LLC may change its registered office or registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that sets forth:

The name of the LLC;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the street address of the new registered office and the zip code for such office and the county in which the office is located;

If its current registered agent is to be changed, the name of its new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the street addresses of its registered office and the business office of its registered agent will be identical.

Change in Registered Office by Registered Agent. If a registered agent changes the street address of such registered agent's business office, such registered agent may change the street address of the registered office of any LLC for which such registered agent is the registered agent by notifying the LLC in writing of the change and signing (either manually or in facsimile) and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement that complies with the requirements of subsection (a) and recites that the LLC has been notified of the change.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-208-103. Resignation of registered agent.

Resignation of Registered Agent. A registered agent of a foreign or domestic LLC may resign such agent's agency appointment by signing and filing with the secretary of state an original statement of resignation accompanied by such agent's certification that such agent has mailed a copy thereof to the principal office of the LLC by certified mail. The statement may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued.

Effective Date of Resignation. The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the date on which the statement is filed by the secretary of state.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

Cross-References. Workers' Compensation Law, “employer” defined, § 50-6-102.

48-208-104. Service on LLC.

Agent for Service of Process. A foreign or domestic LLC's registered agent is the LLC's agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the LLC.

Secretary of State Is Default Agent. Whenever a domestic or foreign LLC authorized to do business in this state fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, whenever its registered agent cannot be found with reasonable diligence, whenever a foreign LLC shall transact business or conduct affairs in this state without first obtaining a certificate of authority from the secretary of state, or whenever the certificate of authority of a foreign LLC shall have been cancelled or revoked, then the secretary of state shall be an agent of such LLC upon whom any such process, notice or demand may be served.

Special Agent for Workers' Compensation. Whenever a domestic or foreign LLC authorized to do business in this state is an employer within the meaning of the Workers' Compensation Law and such LLC is, for the purpose of such Workers' Compensation Law, self-insured or a part of a self-insurance pool as provided in title 50, chapter 6, part 4, such LLC shall, for workers' compensation actions only, be required to appoint the commissioner of commerce and insurance and such commissioner's chief deputy, or their successors, as its true and lawful attorneys upon either of whom all lawful process in any such action or legal proceeding against it may be served as is required of insurance companies by § 56-2-103.

Not Exclusive Means of Service. This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of service on a domestic or foreign LLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-208-105. Procedure for service on domestic or foreign LLC by service on secretary of state.

Service on the secretary of state, when the secretary of state is an agent for a domestic or foreign LLC as provided in § 48-208-104(b), of any process, notice, or demand shall be made by delivering to the office of the secretary of state the original and one (1) copy of such process, notice, or demand, duly certified by the clerk of the court in which the suit or action is pending or brought, together with the proper fee. A statement which identifies which of the grounds, as listed in § 48-208-104(b), for service on the secretary of state is applicable, must be included. The office of the secretary of state shall endorse the time of receipt upon the original and copy and immediately shall send the copy, along with a written notice that service of the original was also made, by registered or certified mail, with return receipt requested, addressed to such LLC at its registered office or principal office (or designated alternative mailing address) as shown in the records on file in the secretary of state's office or as shown in the official registry of the state or country in which such LLC is organized. If none of the previously mentioned addresses are available to the secretary of state, service may be made on any one (1) of the organizers at the address set forth in the articles. The secretary of state may require the plaintiff (or complainant, as the case may be) or plaintiff's attorney to furnish the latter address.

Refusal of Service Ineffective. The refusal or failure of such LLC to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail provided for in subsection (a), or the refusal or failure to sign the return receipt, shall not affect the validity of such service; and any such LLC refusing or failing to accept delivery of such registered or certified mail shall be charged with knowledge of the contents of any process, notice, or demand contained therein.

Receipt Received by Secretary of State. When the registered or certified mail return receipt is received by the office of the secretary of state or when a foreign or domestic LLC refuses or fails to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail and it is returned to the office of the secretary of state, the office of the secretary of state shall forward the receipt or such refused or undelivered mail to the clerk of the court in which the suit or action is pending, together with the original process, notice, or demand, a copy of the notice the secretary of state sent to the defendant LLC and the secretary of state's affidavit setting forth the secretary of state's compliance with this section. Upon receipt thereof, the clerk shall copy the affidavit on the rule docket of the court and shall mark it, the receipt or refused or undelivered mail, and the copy of notice as of the day received and place them in the file of the suit or action where the process and pleadings are kept, and such receipt or refused or undelivered mail, affidavit, and copy of notice shall be and become a part of the technical record in the suit or action, and thereupon service on the defendant shall be complete. Service made under this section shall have the same legal force and validity as if the service had been made personally in this state.

Subsequent Pleadings. Subsequent pleadings or papers permitted or required to be served on such defendant domestic or foreign LLC may be served on the secretary of state as agent for such defendant LLC in the same manner, at the same cost and with the same effect as process, notice, or demand are served on the secretary of state as agent for such defendant LLC under this section.

Minimum Time for Appearance. No appearance shall be required in the suit or action by the defendant domestic or foreign LLC nor shall any judgment be taken against the defendant domestic or foreign LLC in less than one (1) month after the date service is completed under this section.

Record Retained. The secretary of state shall keep a record of all processes, notices, and demands served upon the secretary of state under this section, which record shall include the time of such service and the secretary of state's action with reference thereto.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 2014, ch. 783, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. The phrase “The secretary of state” has been substituted for “be” following “ a copy of the notice” in (c), as a possible interpretation of unclear language in the original text of the section.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.